src/morphology/affixes/quantifiers.lexc
!! Quantifier inflection

!! Erzya quantifiers inflect in many the same cases as regular
!! nouns.


!Dealing with numerals up to 4 digits long
LEXICON Numerals
№+Symbl:№ WORD-END ;
I Roman-numerals ; !
II Roman-numerals ;
III Roman-numerals ;
IV Roman-numerals ;
V Roman-numerals ;
VI Roman-numerals ;
VII Roman-numerals ;
VIII Roman-numerals ;
IX Roman-numerals ;
X Roman-numerals ;
XI Roman-numerals ;
XII Roman-numerals ;
XIII Roman-numerals ;
XIV Roman-numerals ;
XV Roman-numerals ;
XVI Roman-numerals ;
XVII Roman-numerals ;
XVIII Roman-numerals ;
XIX Roman-numerals ;
XX Roman-numerals ;
D Roman-numerals ;
C Roman-numerals ;
L Roman-numerals ;
M Roman-numerals ;

1 Num-1a ;
2 Num-1a ;
3 Num-1a ;
4 Num-1a ;
5 Num-1a ;
6 Num-1a ;
7 Num-1a ;
8 Num-1a ;
9 Num-1a ;

LEXICON Num-1a
+Dig1: Num-1d ;

1 Num-1b ;
2 Num-1b ;
3 Num-1b ;
4 Num-1b ;
5 Num-1b ;
6 Num-1b ;
7 Num-1b ;
8 Num-1b ;
9 Num-1b ;
ZERO Num-1b ;


LEXICON Num-1b
+Dig2: Num-1d ;
1 Num-1c ;
2 Num-1c ;
3 Num-1c ;
4 Num-1c ;
5 Num-1c ;
6 Num-1c ;
7 Num-1c ;
8 Num-1c ;
9 Num-1c ;
ZERO Num-1c ;


LEXICON Num-1c
+Dig3: Num-1d ;
+Dig4:1 Num-1d ;
+Dig4:2 Num-1d ;
+Dig4:3 Num-1d ;
+Dig4:4 Num-1d ;
+Dig4:5 Num-1d ;
+Dig4:6 Num-1d ;
+Dig4:7 Num-1d ;
+Dig4:8 Num-1d ;
+Dig4:9 Num-1d ;
+Dig4:ZERO Num-1d ;


LEXICON Num-1d
+Ord:-це WORD-END ;
+Card: WORD-END ;

!!Roman Numerals
LEXICON Roman-numerals
+Rom: WORD-END ; 


!! !Now regular
LEXICON NUM_КАЛ_SUB
+Err/Sub: NUM_КАЛ ;

LEXICON NUM_КАЛ
+Num+Card: WORD-END ;
+Num+Card+Appr:%>шка WORD-END ;
+Num+Card+Der/MWN: N_КАЛ ;
+Num+Card+Lat:%>О1в Ks ;
+Num: NUMORD_КАЛ ;
+Num+Card+Coll:%>нст WORD-END ;
+Num+Card+Coll@P.TLOSS.ON@:нст@P.TLOSS.ON@  Quants3 ;
+Num+Card+AssocColl@P.KLOSS.ON@:нек@P.KLOSS.ON@ Ks ;
+Num+Card+Appr+AssocColl00@P.KLOSS.ON@:шканек@P.KLOSS.ON@ Ks ;
+Num+Card+AssocColl:%>не _КУДО-Possessives2-Ill ;
+Num+Card+Appr+AssocColl:%>шкане _КУДО-Possessives2-Ill ;
+Num+Card+AssocColl:%>не _КУДО-Possessive-Before-K ;
+Num+Card+Iter:%>ксть Ks ;
+Num+Card+Appr+Iter:%>шкаксть Ks ;


LEXICON NUMORD_КАЛ
+Der/це+A+Ord:%>це WORD-END ;
+Der/це+A+Ord+Der/MWN:%>це N_КУДО ;
+Der/тькс+A+Ord:%>О1тькс WORD-END ;
+Der/тькс+A+Ord+Der/MWN:%>О1тькс N_ОШ ;

LEXICON NUM_ОШ_SUB
+Err/Sub: NUM_ОШ ;

LEXICON NUM_ОШ
+Num+Card: WORD-END ;
+Num+Card+Appr:%>О1шка WORD-END ;
+Num+Card+Der/MWN: N_ОШ ;
+Num+Card+Lat:%>О1в Ks ;
+Num: NUMORD_ОШ ;
+Num+Card+Coll:%>нст WORD-END ;
+Num+Card+Coll@P.TLOSS.ON@:нст@P.TLOSS.ON@  Quants3 ;
+Num+Card+AssocColl@P.KLOSS.ON@:нек@P.KLOSS.ON@ Ks ;
+Num+Card+Appr+AssocColl00@P.KLOSS.ON@:шканек@P.KLOSS.ON@ Ks ;
+Num+Card+AssocColl:%>не _КУДО-Possessives2-Ill ;
+Num+Card+Appr+AssocColl:%>шкане _КУДО-Possessives2-Ill ;
+Num+Card+AssocColl:%>не _КУДО-Possessive-Before-K ;
+Num+Card+Iter:%>ксть Ks ;
+Num+Card+Appr+Iter:%>шкаксть Ks ;

LEXICON NUMORD_ОШ
+Der/це+A+Ord:%>О1%>це WORD-END ;
+Der/це+A+Ord+Der/MWN:%>О1%>це N_КУДО ;
+Der/тькс+A+Ord:%>О1тькс WORD-END ;
+Der/тькс+A+Ord+Der/MWN:%>О1тькс N_ОШ ;

LEXICON NUM_СЯДО_SUB
+Err/Sub: NUM_СЯДО ;

LEXICON NUM_СЯДО
+Num+Card:%>О1 WORD-END ;
+Num+Card+Appr:%>О1шка WORD-END ;
+Num+Card+Der/MWN: N_ПАНГО ;
+Num+Card+Lat:%>О1в Ks ;
+Num:О1 NUMORD_СЯДО ;
+Num+Card+Coll:О1%>нст WORD-END ;
+Num+Card+Coll@P.TLOSS.ON@:О1%>нст@P.TLOSS.ON@  Quants3 ;
+Num+Card+AssocColl@P.KLOSS.ON@:О1%>нек@P.KLOSS.ON@ Ks ;
+Num+Card+Appr+AssocColl00@P.KLOSS.ON@:О1%>шканек@P.KLOSS.ON@ Ks ;
+Num+Card+AssocColl:О1%>не _КУДО-Possessives2-Ill ;
+Num+Card+Appr+AssocColl:О1%>шкане _КУДО-Possessives2-Ill ;
+Num+Card+AssocColl:О1%>не _КУДО-Possessive-Before-K ;
+Num+Card+Iter:О1%>ксть Ks ;
+Num+Card+Appr+Iter:О1%>шкаксть Ks ;

LEXICON NUMORD_СЯДО
+Der/це+A+Ord:%>це WORD-END ;
+Der/це+A+Ord+Der/MWN:%>це N_КУДО ;
+Der/тькс+A+Ord:%>тькс WORD-END ;
+Der/тькс+A+Ord+Der/MWN:%>тькс N_ОШ ;

LEXICON NUM_КУДО_SUB
+Err/Sub: NUM_КУДО ;

! More work needed 2012-10-08
LEXICON NUM_КУДО
+Num+Card: WORD-END ;
+Num+Card+Appr:%>шка WORD-END ;
+Num+Card+Der/MWN: N_КУДО ;
+Num: NUMORD_КУДО ;
+Num+Card+Coll:%>нст WORD-END ;
+Num+Card+Coll@P.TLOSS.ON@:нст@P.TLOSS.ON@  Quants3 ;
+Num+Card+AssocColl@P.KLOSS.ON@:нек@P.KLOSS.ON@ Ks ;
+Num+Card+Appr+AssocColl00@P.KLOSS.ON@:шканек@P.KLOSS.ON@ Ks ;
+Num+Card+AssocColl:%>не _КУДО-Possessives2-Ill ;
+Num+Card+Appr+AssocColl:%>шкане _КУДО-Possessives2-Ill ;
+Num+Card+AssocColl:%>не _КУДО-Possessive-Before-K ;
+Num+Card+Iter:%>ксть Ks ;
+Num+Card+Appr+Iter:%>шкаксть Ks ;
+Num+Card+Lat:%>в Ks ;

LEXICON NUMORD_КУДО
+Der/це+A+Ord:%>це WORD-END ;
+Der/це+A+Ord+Coll+Attr@P.TLOSS.ON@:ценст@P.TLOSS.ON@  Quants3 ;
+Der/це+A+Ord+Der/MWN:%>це N_КУДО ;
+Der/тькс+A+Ord:%>тькс WORD-END ;
+Der/тькс+A+Ord+Der/MWN:%>тькс N_ОШ ;

!!
LEXICON IS-NUM-CARD-COLL
!! кавонст
+Num+Card+Coll: WORD-END ;

LEXICON IS-NUM-ORD-COLL
!! омбонст
+Num+Ord+Coll:	WORD-END ;

LEXICON IS-NUM-CARD-ASSOCCOLL_КАВОНЕ
+Num+AssocColl: PossPX1 ;
+Err/Sub+Num+AssocColl+PxPl1:к WORD-END ; ! 2012-10-28

!!кавто-колмо
LEXICON NUMAPPROX_
+Num+Appr: WORD-END ;

LEXICON Card-2
+Num: Cards-1-2 ;
+Num+Card+Lat:%>в K ;
!!
LEXICON Cards-1-2
+Card: WORD-END ;
+Card+Appr:%>шка WORD-END ;
+Card+Der/MWN: N_КУДО ;


LEXICON Assoc-Coll
+Qnt+AssocColl: N_КУДО-Poss-Declension-PossX ;

LEXICON IS-NUM-CARD-ITER
+Num+Card+Iter: K ;

LEXICON IS-QNT-ITER
+Qnt+Iter: K ;

LEXICON ITER_SUB
+Err/Sub: ITER_ ;

LEXICON ITER_
+Qnt+Iter: K ;
!! once, twice; весть, кавксть, аламоксть

LEXICON ITER-INDEF
+Qnt+Iter+Indef: K ;

LEXICON ORD_
+Num+Ord: K ;

LEXICON ORD_КУДО
+Num+Ord: K ;
+Num+Ord+Der/MWN: N_КУДО ;

LEXICON ORD_ОШ
+Num+Ord: K ;

LEXICON ADV-ORD
+Num+Ord+Adv: K ;
!! васняяк 'first of all'

LEXICON QNT_
+Qnt: K ;

LEXICON QNT_ЛАМО
+Qnt+AssocColl:%>не _КУДО-Possessive-Before-K ;
 QNT_КУДО ;

LEXICON QNT_КУДО
+Qnt: K ;
+Qnt+Der/MWN: N_КУДО ;
+Qnt: DER/PR4_OBL-SC3 ; ! ламольть

LEXICON QNT-ADN
+Qnt+Adn: WORD-END ;

LEXICON QNT-DISTR
+Qnt+Distr: K ;

LEXICON QNT-INDEF
+Qnt+Indef: K ;

LEXICON QNT_ВЕСЕМЕ
+Qnt+Adn: WORD-END ;
+Qnt+Pron@P.POS.PRON@:00@P.POS.PRON@ _КУДО-Indef-Declension-SG ;

+Qnt+Pron@P.POS.PRON@:00@P.POS.PRON@ NMN_DEF-SG-DECLENSION ;

+Qnt+Pron@P.POS.PRON@:00@P.POS.PRON@ SG-NOM-PX ;
+Qnt+Pron@P.POS.PRON@:00@P.POS.PRON@ SG-GEN-PX ;

+Qnt+Pron+Sg+Abl+PxPl2:%>дО1%>нк K ;
+Qnt+Pron+Sg+Abl+PxPl3:%>дО1%>ст K ;
+Qnt+Pron+Sg+Ela+PxPl3:%>стО1%>ст K ;


LEXICON _КУДО-NUM
+Qnt+Num: NMN_DEF-DECLENSION ;
+Qnt+Num: _КУДО-Indef-Declension ;
+Qnt+Num: N_КУДО-Poss-Declension-CX ;

LEXICON sjado-NUM-PL
+Qnt+Num+Der/MWN+N:%> NMN_DEF-PL-DECLENSION ;
+Qnt+Num+Der/MWN+N:%>О1 NMN_DEF-PL-DECLENSION ;
+Qnt+Num+Der/MWN+N: _ПАНГО-Indef-Declension ;
+Qnt+Num+Der/MWN+N: N_ПАНГО-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;


LEXICON Cards-kal
+Num+Ord:%>це Quants3 ;
 Quants2 ;
+Num+Card: WORD-END ;
+Num+Card+Der/MWN: N_КАЛ ;

LEXICON CARDS_ОШ
+Num+Ord:%>О1це Quants3 ;
 Quants2 ;
+Num+Card: WORD-END ;
+Num+Card+Der/MWN: N_ОШ ;


LEXICON CARDS_КУДО
+Num+Ord:%>це Quants3 ;
 Quants2 ;
+Num+Card: WORD-END ;
+Num+Card+Der/MWN: N_КУДО ;


! 2012-08-09
!LEXICON Quants1
! Quants2 ;
! +Ord:%>це Quants3 ;
! +Ord:%>О1це Quants3 ;

LEXICON Quants2
 Quants3 ;
+Coll+Attr@P.TLOSS.ON@:нст@P.TLOSS.ON@  Quants3 ;
+AssocColl@P.KLOSS.ON@:нек@P.KLOSS.ON@ Ks ;
+Appr+AssocColl@P.KLOSS.ON@:шканек@P.KLOSS.ON@ Ks ;
+AssocColl:%>не _КУДО-Possessives2-Ill ;
+Appr+AssocColl:%>шкане _КУДО-Possessives2-Ill ;
+AssocColl:%>не _КУДО-Possessive-Before-K ;
+Iter:%>ксть Ks ;
+Iter:%>%{ОЕЭØ%}ксть Ks ;
+Appr+Iter:%>шкаксть Ks ;
+Appr+Iter:%>%{ОЕЭØ%}шкаксть Ks ;
